Missouri, session 2026, SB1090.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 160.401, to read as
follows:
160.401. 1. Beginning August 28, 2026, no charter
school shall be eligible to operate in this state without
the state board of education's issuance of a certificate of
need for such charter school as provided in this section.
2. A certificate of need shall be required only for
proposed charter schools that are not established as of
August 28, 2026, and shall not be required for:
(1) The renewal of a charter contract pursuant to the
provisions of section 160.405;
(2) The transfer of sponsorship of a charter school in
accordance with rules promulgated by the state board of
education; or
(3) An addition to the grade levels offered by an
established charter school, to be implemented in the same
location where the charter school is currently operated.
3. This section shall not be construed to exempt a
charter school from the requirements of section 160.405 or
any other applicable state or federal law or regulation.

SB 1090 2
4. The charter school certificate of need application
shall consist of a written certification, including
supporting documentation, submitted by the governing board
of the school district or the governing body of the city or
county in which the proposed charter school would be
located, affirming that the following conditions apply to
the school district in which the proposed charter school
would be operated:
(1) Consumer demand for alternative educational
options exceeds supply;
(2) The school district's attendance area contains
sufficient economies of scale to ensure both an adequate
supply of high quality teachers and a sufficient number of
potential students in order for the proposed charter school
to succeed without detrimentally impacting the school
district's ability to provide a free public education for
students who enroll in the school district. For purposes of
this subdivision, "economies of scale" shall mean the
capacity to reduce costs and increase efficiency as student
enrollment numbers change; and
(3) The proposed charter school is likely to:
(a) Alleviate economic and racial inequities across
the school district's attendance centers;
(b) Improve students' academic achievement and test
scores;
(c) Reduce student-teacher ratios across the school
district;
(d) Result in a more efficient education service
delivery system without superfluous duplication of services;
(e) Limit the number of schooling disruptions faced by
children and families; and

SB 1090 3
(f) Address family priorities that are not strictly
educational in nature, including, but not limited to,
safety, convenience, transportation time, neighborhood
walkability, and school culture.
5. The state board of education shall review each
charter school certificate of need application and either
approve or disapprove each application within one hundred
twenty calendar days of receipt. If the board determines
that the information provided in the application is factual
and based on sound data and reasoning, the board shall
consider the conditions of this subsection to be satisfied,
and the board shall approve such application. If the board
determines that the information provided in the application
is not factual and based on sound data and reasoning, the
board shall disapprove the application and provide to the
applicant written documentation of the reasons why the
application was not approved.
6. If the state board of education disapproves an
application pursuant to subsection 5 of this section, the
governing board of the school district or the governing body
of the city or county in which the proposed charter school
would be located may reapply for a certificate of need
pursuant to the provisions of this section not less than one
year after the date of such disapproval.
✓